New Mexico, session 2026, HB270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 13-4D-4 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1992,
Chapter 74, Section 4, as amended) is amended to read:
"13-4D-4. ADMINISTRATION.--
A. The Public Works Apprentice and Training Act
shall be administered by the workforce solutions department.
The department shall collect employers' contributions in
accordance with that act, review employers' compliance
statements, review certified payroll reports to verify
training contributions, investigate allegations of and impose
penalties for employer noncompliance and disburse funds as
provided in Section 13-4D-5 NMSA 1978.

B. Public works construction projects shall not be

constructed unless an employer agrees to make contributions

to approved apprentice and training programs in New Mexico in

which the employer is a participant or to the public works

apprentice and training fund administered by the workforce
HB 270
Page 1

solutions department. Contributions shall be made in the
same manner and in the same amount as apprentice and training
contributions required pursuant to wage rate determinations
made by the department.
C. In establishing apprentice and training
contributions in wage rate determinations for street,
highway, bridge, road, utility and light engineering public
works construction projects, the workforce solutions
department shall set a contribution of zero for any trade
classification for which there is no approved apprentice and
training program.
D. The workforce solutions department shall adopt
rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions
of the Public Works Apprentice and Training Act."
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the
provisions of this act is July 1, 2026. HB 270
Page 2